Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1853
Certificate of public convenience; requirements.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, no jurisdictional utility shall transact business in Nebraska until it has obtained a certificate from the commission that public convenience will be promoted by the transaction of the business and permitting the applicants to transact the business of a jurisdictional utility in this state.

(2) A jurisdictional utility transacting business in this state shall be issued a certificate of convenience based upon its natural gas service as of May 31, 2003.

(3) Every jurisdictional utility shall be required to furnish reasonably adequate and sufficient service and facilities for the use of any and all products or services rendered, furnished, supplied, or produced by such utility.

Laws 2003, LB 790, § 53.